Tennessee, session 114, SB1687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-59-316(e), is amended by deleting
the subsection.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-938(j), is amended by deleting
the subsection.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-701(e), is amended by deleting
subdivision (1) and substituting instead:
(1) The comptroller of the treasury shall annually estimate the cost of the tax
relief program under current program parameters and shall report this estimate to the
department of finance and administration and to the members of the general assembly
as part of the budget preparation process.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1687
009656
- 1 -